da: Flasketype: Skruetop; Spray; Klem; Andet
hu: Palack típusa: Csavaros tetejű; Spray; Összenyomható; Egyéb
pl: Typ butelki: Wieczko odkręcane; Natrysk; Ściśnięcie; Inne
ro-RO: Tip sticlă: Capac filetat; Spray; Sticlă pentru dozare sosuri; Altele
zh-CN: 瓶子类型: 螺旋盖; 喷雾; 挤压; 其他
ja: ボトルタイプ: スクリュートップ; スプレー; 絞る; その他
fr: Type de flacon: Bouchon à vis; Vaporisateur; Pression; Autre
th: ประเภทขวด: ฝาแบบหมุนเกลียว; สเปรย์; หัวบีบ; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος μπουκαλιού: Κοχλιωτό πώμα; Σπρέι; Πιεζόμενη φιάλη; Άλλο
vi: Loại chai: Nắp vặn; Dạng xịt; Bóp; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de frasco: De enroscar; Pulverizador; De apertar; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de garrafa: Aparafusada; Spray; Squeeze; Outro
fi: Pullotyyppi: Kierrekorkki; Suihke; Puristettava; Muu
es: Tipo de frasco: Tapón de rosca; Aerosol; Exprimible; Otros
nl: Flestype: Schroefdop; Spray; Knijpen; Andere
lt-LT: Butelio tipas: Užsukamas kamštelis; Su purkštuvu; Išspaudžiamas; Kita
bg-BG: Тип бутилка: Завинтване; Спрей; Стискане; Други
sv: Flasktyp: Skruvkork; Spray; Pressa; Övrigt
tr: Şişe Tipi: Vidalı kapak; Sprey; Sıkma; Diğer
cs: Typ láhve: Šroubovací vršek; Sprej; Stlačovací; Jiné
ru: Тип бутылки: Завинчивающаяся крышка; Аэрозоль; Мягкая; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta boce: Navojni čep; Sprej; Stisak; Ostalo
ko: 젖병 유형: 스크루탑; 스프레이; 스퀴즈; 기타
de: Flaschentyp: Schraudeckel; Spray; Quetschen; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di bottiglia: Tappo a vite; Spray; In tubetto; Altro
sk-SK: Typ fľaše: Skrutkovací vrchnák; Sprej; Stlačiteľný; Iné
en: Bottle type: Screw-top; Spray; Squeeze; Other
zh-TW: 瓶子類型: 螺絲蓋的; 噴霧; 擠壓; 其他
nb: Flasketype: Skruetopp; Spray; Skvis; Annet
sl-SI: Vrsta stekleničke: Z navojnim zamaškom; Razpršilo; Za stiskanje; Drugo